Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Chapter 77. Venture Capital Act of 1994
§ 57-77-35.
Sale of bonds; temporary bonds; investment of bond proceeds; registration of bond sales; payment of costs and expenses.

Whenever bonds are issued, they shall be offered for sale at not less than par value and accrued interest and shall be sold by the seller at public or private sale, from time to time, in such manner and at such price as may be determined by the seller to be most advantageous.

Any portion of any bond issue so offered and not sold or subscribed for at public sale may be disposed of by private sale by the seller in such manner and at such prices not less than par and accrued interest, as the seller shall direct.

When bonds are issued from time to time, the bonds of each issue shall constitute a separate series to be designated by the seller or may be combined for sale as one (1) series with other general obligation bonds of the State of Mississippi.

Until permanent bonds can be prepared, the seller may, in its discretion, issue in lieu of permanent bonds, temporary bonds in such form and with such privileges as to registration and exchange for permanent bonds as may be determined by the seller.

Pending their application to the purposes authorized, bond proceeds held or deposited by the State Treasurer may be invested or reinvested as are other funds in the custody of the State Treasurer in the manner provided by law. All earnings received from the investment or deposit of such funds shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the Venture Capital Fund.

The State Treasurer shall prepare the necessary registry book to be kept in the office of the duly authorized loan and transfer agent of the state for the registration of any bonds, at the request of the owners thereof, according to the terms and conditions of issue directed by the seller.

All costs and expenses in connection with the issue of and sale and registration of the bonds and notes in connection with this chapter, and all costs and expenses, validly incurred pursuant to this chapter, in connection with implementation of the program and development of application forms, procedures and requirements for use in connection with the program, may be paid from the proceeds of bonds and notes issued under this chapter.

The seller may provide, in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds, for the employment of one or more persons or firms to assist in the sale of the bonds; to enter into contracts with financial institutions located either within or without the State of Mississippi to act as registrar, paying agents, transfer agents, or otherwise; for rating of the bonds; and to purchase insurance.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 650, § 19; Laws, 1998, ch. 563, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1998).

§ 57-77-37.
Disposition of proceeds of sale of bonds; allocation of nonfederal funds.

The proceeds realized from the sale of bonds and notes under this chapter shall be paid to the State Treasurer and deposited into the Venture Capital Fund and specifically dedicated to the purposes enumerated in this chapter.

All nonfederal funds which may become available for the purposes of this chapter shall be deposited in the Venture Capital Fund and shall be allocated for the purposes of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 650, § 20, eff from and after passage (approved April 8, 1994).

§ 57-77-39.
Representation of seller by Attorney General with respect to issuing, selling and validating bonds or notes; payment of expenses relating to issuance of bonds or notes.

Except as otherwise authorized in Section 7-5-39, the Attorney General of the State of Mississippi shall represent the seller in issuing, selling and validating bonds or notes herein provided for, and the seller is hereby authorized and empowered to expend from the proceeds derived from the sale of the bonds or notes authorized hereunder all necessary administrative, legal and other expenses incidental and related to the issuance of bonds or notes authorized under this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 650, § 21; Laws, 2012, ch. 546, § 26, eff from and after July 1, 2012.